South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S496.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - South Carolina Real Estate Appraisers Board, relating to South Carolina Real Estate Appraisers Board, designated as Regulation Document Number 5340, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina Real Estate Appraisers Board proposes to amend Chapter 137 to conform to H.3278, passed in 2024 and to make various other changes. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on May 24, 2024. ----XX----